Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Nonprofit bird preservation organization. new text end new text begin (a) Sales, except those listed in paragraph (b), to a nonprofit bird preservation organization are exempt if the items purchased are used in Minnesota to develop, preserve, restore, or maintain waterfowl, pheasant, or quail habitats. As used in this subdivision, "nonprofit bird preservation organization" means a nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to support the life cycle of waterfowl, pheasants, or quail through developing, preserving, restoring, or maintaining habitats in Minnesota and that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (b) This exemption does not apply to the following sales: new text end new text begin (1) building, construction, or reconstruction materials purchased by a contractor or a subcontractor as part of a lump-sum contract or similar type of contract with a guaranteed maximum price covering both labor and materials for use in the construction, alteration, or repair of a building or facility used by the qualifying bird organization; new text end new text begin (2) lodging as defined under section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (2), prepared food, candy, soft drinks, taxable cannabis products as defined under section 295.81, subdivision 1, paragraph (r), and alcoholic beverages as defined in section 297A.67, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (3) leasing of a motor vehicle as defined in section 297B.01, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2025. new text end